Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1626.01
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that all persons residing in the State of Nebraska have access to public health services. It is the intent of the Legislature that local public health departments be established statewide and work collaboratively with local providers and community organizations in order to assure the full range of public health services as prescribed by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention of the United States Department of Health and Human Services. The Legislature declares that each local public health department should be able to carry out core public health functions. Core public health functions include assessment and policy development, prevention of illness and disease, and assurance of services including public health nursing, health education, and environmental health services.

Laws 2001, LB 692, § 4.